District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

9-113.05

Council to close certain streets, roads or highways in the District rendered useless or unnecessary by the highway plan — Consent of owners.

Repealed.

Jan. 30, 1925, 43 Stat. 799, ch. 116, § 1
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 722, 30 DCR 148
1981 Ed., §§ 7-123, 7-124.